Idaho statutes. Title 62 RAILROADS AND OTHER PUBLIC UTILITIES
Chapter 13
ELECTRICAL AND NATURAL AND MANUFACTURED GAS CONSUMPTION FROM PUMPING

Sec.

§ 62-1301. Legislative intent.

The legislature of the state of Idaho recognizes that the issue of ground water depletion requires careful evaluation and study. Pertinent to such evaluation and study is the electric and natural and manufactured gas consumption of motors pumping water from wells.

§ 62-1302. Submission of pumping data by electric and gas suppliers.

Upon receipt of a request from the Idaho department of water resources, filed in accordance with procedures of the Idaho public utilities commission, all suppliers of electric power, or natural or manufacturer [manufactured] gas, including those otherwise excepted under section 61-104, Idaho Code, shall submit an annual report after the close of the irrigation season. The report shall contain electric or gas consumption data for all accounts that are categorized as irrigation customers in geographic areas designated by the commission.

§ 62-1303. Adoption of procedures.

The Idaho public utilities commission, after notice and hearing pursuant to its rules of practice and procedure, shall promulgate rules that are necessary to implement the procedures for submission of electric and gas consumption reports. Such procedures shall provide that only the Idaho department of water resources may request electric and gas consumption data. In implementing such rules, the commission shall limit the submission of data to customer name, service location, customer account number, and power or gas consumption.

§ 62-1304. Compensation to suppliers.

Electric or gas suppliers that are required to submit consumption reports shall be entitled to claim reimbursement for the preparation of the required data, under procedures established by the commission. Reimbursement for the costs incurred in preparing and submitting the data will be paid by the Idaho department of water resources.

§ 62-1305. Submission of data to Idaho department of water resources.

As directed by the public utilities commission, electric and natural and manufactured gas suppliers shall forward consumption reports to the department of water resources in the manner prescribed by the commission rules.